New Jersey, session 222, S2603.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Receipts from the sale of books at school book fairs shall be exempt from the tax imposed under the Sales and Use Tax Act, P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.). b.    As used in this section, school book fair means a fair held at an elementary or secondary school, at which the sale of books is offered exclusively to the students at that school and to the parents and guardians of those students. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment.